dictionaries/lb/index.aff
FLAG long
SFX e0 N 92
SFX e0 aarm äerm aarm is:plural
SFX e0 aart äert aart is:plural
SFX e0 aascht äscht aascht is:plural
SFX e0 ascht äscht [^Aa]ascht is:plural
SFX e0 arsch ärsch [^Aa]arsch is:plural
SFX e0 ach éch [^aKk]ach is:plural
SFX e0 ack äck ack is:plural
SFX e0 n 0 en is:eifeler
SFX e0 afen äfen/c0 afen is:plural
SFX e0 aff äff aff is:plural
SFX e0 ak äck ak is:plural
SFX e0 al äl al is:plural
SFX e0 all äll all is:plural
SFX e0 allem ällem allem is:plural
SFX e0 amm ämm amm is:plural
SFX e0 amp ämp [^Kkw]amp is:plural
SFX e0 amp ämm [Kkw]amp is:plural
SFX e0 ampf ämpf ampf is:plural
SFX e0 and änn and is:plural
SFX e0 ang äng ang is:plural
SFX e0 ank äng [^Rr]ank is:plural
SFX e0 anz änz anz is:plural
SFX e0 app äpp app is:plural
SFX e0 arm ärm [^Aad]arm is:plural
SFX e0 ass ëss [Rr]ass is:plural
SFX e0 ass äss [^Rr]ass is:plural
SFX e0 att ätt [Pp]att is:plural
SFX e0 atz ätz atz is:plural
SFX e0 az ätz az is:plural
SFX e0 ag éi lag is:plural
SFX e0 och éch och is:plural
SFX e0 ock éck ock is:plural
SFX e0 omp ëmp omp is:plural
SFX e0 ond ënn ond is:plural
SFX e0 ong éng ong is:plural
SFX e0 onk éng [^Zz]onk is:plural
SFX e0 onsch ënsch onsch is:plural
SFX e0 orf ërf orf is:plural
SFX e0 oss ëss oss is:plural
SFX e0 ou éi ou is:plural
SFX e0 ouer éier ouer is:plural
SFX e0 oun éin oun is:plural
SFX e0 ount éint ount is:plural
SFX e0 ag äg rag is:plural
SFX e0 ot éit ot is:plural
SFX e0 auch äich auch is:plural
SFX e0 ouss éiss ouss is:plural
SFX e0 ant änn ant is:plural
SFX e0 or är or is:plural
SFX e0 oup éip oup is:plural
SFX e0 out éit out is:plural
SFX e0 ollef ëllef ollef is:plural
SFX e0 arm äerm darm is:plural
SFX e0 antel äntel antel is:plural
SFX e0 oscht ëscht oscht is:plural
SFX e0 aarsch äersch aarsch is:plural
SFX e0 auscht äischt auscht is:plural
SFX e0 ann änn ann is:plural
SFX e0 ochs échs ochs is:plural
SFX e0 als äls als is:plural
SFX e0 atz ëtz [Bb]atz is:plural
SFX e0 ouschter éischter ouschter is:plural
SFX e0 aut äit [^Hh]aut is:plural
SFX e0 aasser ässer aasser is:plural
SFX e0 ach äch [Kk]ach is:plural
SFX e0 andel ändel andel is:plural
SFX e0 akt äkt akt is:plural
SFX e0 off ëff off is:plural
SFX e0 oul éil oul is:plural
SFX e0 onft ënft onft is:plural
SFX e0 ank éng [Rr]ank is:plural
SFX e0 acht ächt acht is:plural
SFX e0 otz ëtz otz is:plural
SFX e0 oum éim oum is:plural
SFX e0 att ëtt natt is:plural
SFX e0 arg ärg arg is:plural
SFX e0 opp ëpp opp is:plural
SFX e0 apel äppel apel is:plural
SFX e0 aufel äifel aufel is:plural
SFX e0 uss ëss luss is:plural
SFX e0 o éi o is:plural
SFX e0 omb ëmb omb is:plural
SFX e0 oer eeër oer is:plural
SFX e0 auz äiz auz is:plural
SFX e0 onk énk [Zz]onk is:plural
SFX e0 appvoll äppvoll appvoll is:plural
SFX e0 ammel ämmel ammel is:plural
SFX e0 Aarm Äerm Aarm is:plural
SFX e0 Aarsch Äersch Aarsch is:plural
SFX e0 Apel Äppel Apel is:plural
SFX e0 Abt Äbt Abt is:plural
SFX e0 angel ängel angel is:plural

SFX f0 N 2
SFX f0 r sch/n0 r is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX f0 rt sch/n0 rt is:m2f is:feminine is:singular

SFX c0 Y 2
SFX c0 n 0 [^n]n is:eifeler
SFX c0 nn 0 nn is:eifeler is:eifeler_nn

SFX l1 N 6
SFX l1 a en/c0 a is:plural
SFX l1 os en/c0 os is:plural
SFX l1 um en/c0 um is:plural
SFX l1 o en/c0 o is:plural
SFX l1 us en/c0 us is:plural
SFX l1 s en/c0 is is:plural

SFX n3 Y 3
SFX n3 s en/c0 [^ao]ss is:plural
SFX n3 oss sen/c0 oss is:plural
SFX n3 ass sen/c0 ass is:plural

SFX f6 N 3
SFX f6 0 in . is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX f6 0 innen . is:m2f is:feminine is:singular is:plural
SFX f6 0 inne . is:m2f is:feminine is:singular is:plural is:eifeler

SFX r0 N 3
SFX r0 0 er [^e] is:plural
SFX r0 n 0 äin is:eifeler
SFX r0 0 r e is:plural

SFX r3 N 2
SFX r3 n r . is:plural
SFX r3 n 0 . is:eifeler

SFX n1 N 20
SFX n1 0 ken/c0 c is:plural
SFX n1 0 fen/c0 f is:plural
SFX n1 0 gen/c0 g is:plural
SFX n1 k cken/c0 k is:plural
SFX n1 0 len/c0 l is:plural
SFX n1 e len/c0 le is:plural
SFX n1 0 men/c0 m is:plural
SFX n1 e men/c0 me is:plural
SFX n1 0 nen/c0 n is:plural
SFX n1 e nen/c0 ne is:plural
SFX n1 0 pen/c0 p is:plural
SFX n1 e pen/c0 pe is:plural
SFX n1 0 sen/c0 s is:plural
SFX n1 e sen/c0 se is:plural
SFX n1 0 ten/c0 t is:plural
SFX n1 e ten/c0 te is:plural
SFX n1 e fen/c0 fe is:plural
SFX n1 0 ben/c0 b is:plural
SFX n1 0 wen/c0 w is:plural
SFX n1 0 zen/c0 z is:plural

SFX r1 N 11
SFX r1 0 ker c is:plural
SFX r1 0 fer f is:plural
SFX r1 0 ler l is:plural
SFX r1 0 mer m is:plural
SFX r1 0 ser s is:plural
SFX r1 0 ter t is:plural
SFX r1 e ter te is:plural
SFX r1 e mer me is:plural
SFX r1 k cker k is:plural
SFX r1 0 zer z is:plural
SFX r1 ip ipper ip is:plural

SFX n2 N 2
SFX n2 0 ën . is:plural
SFX n2 0 ë . is:plural is:eifeler

SFX r2 N 1
SFX r2 0 ër . is:plural

SFX d0 N 8
SFX d0 n 0 . is:eifeler
SFX d0 chen ercher [^är]chen is:plural
SFX d0 rchen rercher ärchen is:plural
SFX d0 chen ercher [^ä]rchen is:plural
SFX d0 jen ercher [^u]tjen is:plural
SFX d0 utjen tercher uutjen is:plural
SFX d0 jen ercher [^u]utjen is:plural
SFX d0 ächen äercher ächen is:plural
