dictionaries/lb/index.dic
Anthropomorphismus/l1n1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Anthropophil/n1r1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Aschreiffraisen/c0 po:noun ts:_plural
Auslännertheema/n0l1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Ausstellungssall/e0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Auswee/r2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Bahrainer/f6m0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Bakteeriendréier/f0f6m0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Baulandpräis/r1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Bauspuerkeess/n3 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Bauvolume/n1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Béigen/c0p0
Belästegungsskandal/r0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Bettspree/n2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Bichelchen/r3 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Bicherbus/n1r1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Blummegaart/e0k6 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Bluttsäckelchen/r3 po:noun
Bolognaisezooss/n3 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Boxemännchen/d0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Bremswee/r2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Broochschësser/f0m0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Bünemanager/n0f6 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Chrëschtdagsalbum/n0l1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Däichwiss/n3 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Datzebichelchen/r3 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Deelpolitik/n1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Demokratieverständnes/r1 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Derivat/n0r0 po:noun
Dickelchen/r3 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Distilleriesmusée/n2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Dokter/n0f0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Doppingverstouss/e0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Drogekonsument/n0f6 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
dropgeschloen/c0 po:verb
Duechterfirma/n0l1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Eeërdëppchen/d0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
erugetrueden/c0 po:verb
Exbuergermeeschter/n0f0f6 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Exsklav/n0f6 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Familljegeheimnis/r1 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Familljenhond/e0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Familljeroman/n0r0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Fee/n2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Fenschelzooss/n3 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Filmfestival/n1r1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Finanzéierungswee/r2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Finanzgremium/n0l1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Fouermeeschter/n0f0f6 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Gackelchen/r3 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Gambist/n0f6 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Gasmaart/e0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Gelee/n2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Generatiounemodell/r0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Geometer/n0f0f6 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Geriichtskäschten/c0 po:noun ts:_plural
Gesetzeswee/r2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Gielchen/d0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Grondbedierfnis/r1 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Guckfënsterchen/r3 po:noun
Haaptagank/e0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Haaptgremium/n0l1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Haffspezialist/n0f6 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Hammbierszooss/n3 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Hännes/n1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Hautdokter/n0f0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Holzwee/r2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Hondshaischen/d0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Ierfschaftskrich/r0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Iewen/c0 po:noun ts:masculine_plural
Individuum/n0l1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Infrastrukturplang/e0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Intejippelchen/r3 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Iraner/f6m0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Japaneschprofesser/n0f0f4 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Jazzfestival/n1r1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Journée/n2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Kanéngchen/d0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Kannerklinik/n1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Keess/n3 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Kielen/c0p0
Klimaschutzpak/e0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Kloterkleeschen/d0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Komorer/f6m0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Kompetenzzentrum/n0l1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Kompetitivitéitspakt/n0r0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Kouwiss/n3 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Kräizwee/r2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Krichsmusée/n2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Laachkrämpchen/d0 po:noun
Lackéierer/f0f5 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Länterchen/r3 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Lëschtenhond/e0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Leverkusen/c0p0
Liewenswee/r2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Literaturnobelpräis/r1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Literaturzentrum/n0l1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Logik/n1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Mangozooss/n3 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Medienoptrëtt/r0s0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Meedchen/d0s1 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Minièresmusée/n2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Muerdfall/e0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Museksstudent/n0f6 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Nervendokter/n0f0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Nilles/n1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
nogezunn/c0 po:verb
Noriichtenzyklus/l1n1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Nuechtigailchen/d0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Openthaltserlabnis/r1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Opkafprogramm/r0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Orchidee/n2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Otemwee/r2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Oweskeess/n3 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Pappejéngelchen/r3 po:noun
Pinktchen/d0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Privatfirma/n0l1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Profiterole/n1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Quäler/f6m0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Rack/e0k6 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
rageschwommen/c0 po:verb
Rakéitenofwiersystem/r0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Regionalinspekter/n0f0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Reklammsbichelchen/r3 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Rentekeess/n3 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Retourbilljee/n2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Roamingpräis/r1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Rullwee/r2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Schülertransport/r0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Sécherheetsequipe/n1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Sechstchen/d0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Setzen/r3 po:noun
Sozialbehuelen/c0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Soziologieprofesser/n0f0f4 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Spadséierwee/r2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Spaghettiszooss/n3 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Spezialdrot/e0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Sportsfrënd/f6k4e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Spuenientournée/n2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Stadium/l1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Stroossekarneval/n1r1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Studentenheem/r0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Synopsis/n1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Trauerwee/r2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Trohee/n2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Uewerbuergermeeschter/n0f0f6 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Vanillszooss/n3 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Vëlofueren/c0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Versuchskanéngchen/d0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Vertrauensmëssbrauch/e0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Verwaltungsdéngscht/r0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Verzeechnes/r1 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Virreider/f6m0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Walkampfofkommes/n1 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Wanderwee/r2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Wellen/r3 po:noun
Wochenthema/n0l1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
zesummegeleeën/c0 po:verb
Zuchbilljee/n2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
